Washington statutes.
RCW 10.79.170

Strip, body cavity searches—Nonliability when search delayed.

No governmental entity and no employee or contracting agent of a governmental entity shall be liable for injury, death, or damage caused by a person in custody when the injury, death, or damage is caused by or made possible by contraband that would have been discovered sooner but for the delay caused by having to seek a search warrant under RCW 10.79.080 or 10.79.130 through 10.79.160.

[ 1986 c 88 s 6.]